Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.150

Certain other acts not applicable.

The provisions of section 6 of chapter 180 of the Laws of 1937 shall not be applicable to a bureau or a committee as authorized by this chapter, or to the bar board or the Washington State Bar Association.

[ 1939 c 93 s 15; RRS s 10007-215. Formerly RCW 74.36.150.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 1937 c 180 s 6 was repealed by 1939 c 216 s 35.